Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 99B.15, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: e. A prize shall be distributed on the day the prize is won, except that if the winner is not present, notification to the winner shall be made as soon as practical within one year of the prize being awarded . ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2506, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor